src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
=================================== !
The Wasco-Wishram morphophonological/twolc rules file !
=================================== !

* U+01E4 LATIN CAPITAL LETTER G With Stroke
* U+01E5 LATIN SMALL LETTER G With Stroke
* X and U+0331 Combining Macron Below
* x and U+0331 Combining Macron Below
* U+02BC MODIFIER LETTER APOSTROPHE

* U+01C3 LATIN LETTER RETROFLEX CLICK
* U+02B9 MODIFIER LETTER PRIME
* U+1D07 Latin Letter Small Capital E ᴇ
* U+0141 Latin Capital Letter L with Stroke Ł
* U+0142 Latin Small Letter L with Stroke ł
* U+1D58 Modifier letter small U
* x with combining dot below U+0323
* g with combining dot below U+0323

Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries below):

* »
* «
* >
* <

Morpheme boundaries:
* Derivational prefix
* Derivational suffix
* Inflectional prefix
* Inflectional suffix
* Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
* (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
* Hyphen for question particle
* Compounding rules

End of alphabet definitions

* *primus%>s*
* *primus00*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-wac/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>
